Utah statutes.
78B-12-105.   Duty of parents.
(1)  Every child is presumed to be in need of the support of the child's
mother and father.  Every mother and father shall support their children.
(2)  Except as limited in a court order under Section 30-3-5, 30-4-3, or
78B-12-212:
(a)  The expenses incurred on behalf of a minor child for reasonable and
necessary medical and dental expenses, and other necessities are chargeable
upon the property of both parents, regardless of the marital status of the
parents.
(b)  Either or both parents may be sued by a creditor for the expenses
described in Subsection (2)(a) incurred on behalf of minor children.
